Utah statutes.
53B-16-107.   Credit for military service and training -- Transferability -- Reporting.

(1)  As used in this section, "credit" includes proof of equivalent noncredit course completion awarded by the Utah College of Applied Technology.

(2)  An institution of higher education listed in Section 53B-2-101 shall award credit for military service and training as recommended by a postsecondary accreditation agency or association designated by the State Board of Regents or the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees if:

(a)  requested by the student; and

(b)  the student has met with an advisor at an institution of higher education listed in Section 53B-2-101 at which the student intends to enroll to discuss applicability of credit to program requirements, possible financial aid implications, and other factors that may impact attainment of the student's educational goals.

(3)  Upon transfer within the state system of higher education, a student may present a transcript to the receiving institution for evaluation and to determine the applicability of credit to the student's program of study, and the receiving institution shall evaluate the credit to be transferred pursuant to Subsection (2).

(4)  The State Board of Regents and the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees shall annually report the number of credits awarded under this section by each institution of higher education to the Education Interim Committee and the Utah Department of Veterans' Affairs.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 2013 General Session

